South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4585.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 8-1-70 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 8-1-70.  (A) If any clerk of the court of common pleas and general sessions, sheriff, judge of probate, or register of deeds, mayor, county council member, town council member, or city council member in this State shall be reported by a circuit solicitor as having wilfully failed or neglected to discharge any of the duties or to perform any of the services appertaining to his office which are required of him by law, including negligent or irresponsible financial decisions, the court shall order a bill of indictment to be preferred against such delinquent officer. (B) Within fourteen days after an indictment, the Governor shall suspend the delinquent officer. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----